Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2647YH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 365 Section 1. Section 707.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. (1) A person who unlawfully delivers, 3 dispenses, or otherwise provides fentanyl, as defined in 4 section 124.204, subsection 2, paragraphs âatâ through âclâ , or 5 a fentanyl-related substance, as defined in section 124.204, 6 subsection 9, paragraph âaâ , to another person, in violation of 7 the provisions of section 124.401, that results in the death 8 of the other person, if the proximate cause of the death of 9 the other person is the injection, inhalation, absorption, or 10 ingestion of any amount of the fentanyl or fentanyl-related 11 substance. 12 (2) It is not a defense pursuant to this paragraph that 13 the other person contributed to the personâs own death by 14 the purposeful, knowing, reckless, or negligent injection, 15 inhalation, absorption, or ingestion of the controlled 16 substance or by consenting to the administration of the 17 controlled substance by another person. 18